Louisiana, session 2026, HB1044.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 9:2801.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §2801.3. Award for future earnings; separate property
8 Future wages or earnings of a spouse set forth in an employment contract
9 executed during the community property regime are the separate property of the
10 contracting spouse for any unearned portions of the contract existing on the date the
11 community property regime is terminated, including but not limited to any amounts
12 later paid as severance pay or liquidated damages.
13 Section 2. It is the intent of the legislature to overrule Orgeron v. Orgeron, 413 So.
3d 390 (2025).
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.